Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 7. REHABILITATION OF INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES

CHAPTER 112. DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 112.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Council" means the Texas Council for Developmental Disabilities.

(2) "Designated state agency" means the executive agency designated by the governor to provide administrative support and fiscal management services to the council in accordance with this chapter and federal law.

(3) "Developmental disability" means a severe, chronic disability as defined by applicable federal developmental disability laws.

(4) "Applicable federal developmental disability laws" refers to the various Acts of Congress providing for assistance and services to persons with developmental disabilities and codified as 42 U.S.C. Section 15001 et seq.

(5) "Protection and advocacy system" means the system established in this state under the applicable federal developmental disabilities laws for the purpose of advocating for and protecting the rights of persons with developmental disabilities.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 603, Sec. 11, 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.403, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 112.002. PURPOSE AND LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. (a) The purpose of this chapter is to establish a developmental disabilities program that assures compliance with applicable federal developmental disability laws.

(b) The legislature finds that persons with developmental disabilities have a right to appropriate treatment, services, and habilitation for their disabilities within the funds available for those purposes and that the treatment, services, and habilitation for a person with developmental disabilities must be designed to maximize the developmental potential of the person and must be provided in the setting that is least restrictive of the person's personal liberty.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 603, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER B. TEXAS COUNCIL FOR DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

Sec. 112.011. ESTABLISHMENT. The Texas Council for Developmental Disabilities is established.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 112.0111. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "executive director" means the executive director of the council.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 112.012. MEMBERS. The members of the council shall be appointed by the governor in accordance with applicable federal developmental disability laws. The governor may appoint as many members to the council as is determined appropriate for the council to accomplish its purposes but must appoint, in total membership, an odd number of members to the council. Appointments to the council shall be made without regard to:

(1) the race, color, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointees; or

(2) the disability of the appointees, except as required by applicable federal developmental disability laws.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 264, Sec. 28, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 603, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 793, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 9.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 112.013. TERMS. (a) Members of the council appointed by the governor serve for staggered terms of six years with the term of one-third or approximately one-third of the members expiring on February 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(b) A person may not serve on the council more than two consecutive six-year terms.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 9.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 112.014. VACANCIES. (a) A position on the council becomes vacant if:

(1) a member resigns from the council by providing written notice to the chair; or

(2) a member ceases to be a resident of this state.

(b) If a position on the council becomes vacant, the chair shall provide written notice to the governor requesting a new appointment to fill the remainder of the member's term.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.404, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 112.015. EXPENSES. (a) Council members appointed under Section 112.012 serve without salary but are entitled to reimbursement for actual expenses incurred in performing their duties, including travel, meals, lodging, and telephone long-distance charges.

(b) Members of the council who have a disability and who, because of the disability, require special aids or travel companions are entitled to reimbursement for those costs.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 112.016. OFFICERS. (a) The governor shall designate a member of the council to be the presiding officer.

(b) The presiding officer serves in that capacity at the will of the governor.

(c) A representative of a state agency may not serve as chair or vice-chair.

(d) The council shall meet quarterly in regular session and on call by the chair when necessary for the transaction of council business.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 603, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 112.0161. CONFLICTS OF INTEREST. (a) In this section, "Texas trade association" means a cooperative and voluntarily joined association of business or professional competitors in this state designed to assist its members and its industry or profession in dealing with mutual business or professional problems and in promoting their common interest.

(b) A person may not be a member of the council and may not be a council employee employed in a "bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity," as that phrase is used for purposes of establishing an exemption to the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Section 201 et seq.) and its subsequent amendments, if:

(1) the person is an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of developmental disabilities; or

(2) the person's spouse is an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of developmental disabilities.

(c) Unless otherwise required by applicable federal developmental disability laws, a person may not be a member of the council or act as the general counsel to the council if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the council.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 112.0162. REMOVAL OF COUNCIL MEMBER. (a) It is a ground for removal from the council that a member:

(1) does not have at the time of taking office the qualifications required by applicable federal developmental disability laws;

(2) is ineligible for membership under Section 112.0161;

(3) fails to discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the member's term; or

(4) is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled council meetings that the member is eligible to attend during a calendar year without an excuse approved by a majority vote of the council.

(b) The validity of an action of the council is not affected by the fact that it is taken when a ground for removal of a council member exists.

(c) If the executive director has knowledge that a potential ground for removal exists, the executive director shall notify the presiding officer of the council of the potential ground. The presiding officer shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists. If the potential ground for removal involves the presiding officer, the executive director shall notify the next highest ranking officer of the council, who shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 112.0163. COUNCIL MEMBER TRAINING. (a) A person who is appointed to and qualifies for office as a member of the council may not vote, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the council until the person completes a training program that complies with this section.

(b) The training program must provide the person with information regarding:

(1) the legislation that created the council;

(2) the programs operated by the council;

(3) the role and functions of the designated state agency and council under this chapter and applicable federal developmental disability laws;

(4) the rules of the council, with an emphasis on the rules that relate to disciplinary and investigatory authority;

(5) the current budget for the council;

(6) the results of the most recent formal audit of the council;

(7) the requirements of:

(A) the open meetings law, Chapter 551, Government Code;

(B) the public information law, Chapter 552, Government Code;

(C) the administrative procedure law, Chapter 2001, Government Code; and

(D) other laws relating to public officials, including conflict of interest laws; and

(8) any applicable ethics policies adopted by the council or the Texas Ethics Commission.

(c) A person appointed to the council is entitled to reimbursement, as provided by the General Appropriations Act, for the travel expenses incurred in attending the training program regardless of whether the attendance at the program occurs before or after the person qualifies for office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 112.017. BYLAWS. The council may adopt bylaws and policies consistent with this chapter and applicable state or federal law.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 603, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 112.018. DESIGNATED STATE AGENCY. (a) The governor shall designate, by executive order, a state agency to provide administrative support to the council and receive federal and state funds appropriated for the council. In accordance with federal law, the governor may select one of the following to serve as the designated state agency:

(1) the council;

(2) a state agency that does not provide or pay for services made available to persons with developmental disabilities;

(3) a state agency that provides or pays for services made available to persons with developmental disabilities if the state agency was designated by the governor under this section before June 30, 1994, and the governor has not changed the designation;

(4) a state office, including the office of the governor; or

(5) a state planning office.

(b) The designated state agency shall receive, deposit, and disburse funds for the council in accordance with this chapter, applicable federal developmental disability laws, and the purposes and priorities established by the council in the state plan developed under Section 112.019.

(c) The designated state agency, in accordance with state law and procedures, shall provide for fiscal control and fund-accounting procedures necessary to assure the proper disbursement of and accounting for funds available to the council.

(d) Unless the council is serving as the designated state agency, the council shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the designated state agency that delineates the roles and responsibilities of the designated state agency under this chapter.

(e) The designated state agency may adopt rules as necessary to implement the agency's duties under this chapter and applicable federal developmental disability laws.

(f) A designated state agency may not assign duties to staff of the council unless the council is serving as the designated state agency.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 603, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 112.019. STATE PLAN FOR DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES. (a) The council shall develop and submit the state plan for persons with developmental disabilities. The plan must conform to applicable federal developmental disability laws.

(b) Unless the council is serving as the designated state agency, the council shall consult with the designated state agency before submitting the state plan required by this section solely to:

(1) obtain appropriate assurances with respect to the plan as required by federal law; and

(2) ensure that the plan is consistent with state law.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 603, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 112.020. ADDITIONAL COUNCIL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) In addition to powers and duties derived by the council from applicable federal developmental disability laws or other provisions of this chapter, the council shall:

(1) undertake at the request of the governor and the legislature activities appropriate to the achievement of legislative and executive functions relating to persons with developmental disabilities or other disabling conditions;

(2) submit to the governor, legislature, and other appropriate state and federal authorities periodic reports on the council's responsibilities and performance;

(3) develop and implement policies that clearly separate the policymaking responsibilities of the council and the management responsibilities of the executive director and the staff of the council; and

(4) develop and implement policies that provide the public with a reasonable opportunity to appear before the council and to speak on any issue under the jurisdiction of the council.

(b) The council may:

(1) adopt rules as necessary to implement the council's duties and responsibilities under this chapter and applicable federal developmental disability laws;

(2) approve and execute an annual budget for council activities under this chapter that is consistent with applicable federal developmental disability laws; and

(3) contract with or provide grants to agencies, organizations, or individuals as necessary to implement council activities under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5272, ch. 970, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 603, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 112.0201. COMPLAINTS. (a) The council shall maintain a file on each written complaint filed with the council. The file must include:

(1) the name of the person who filed the complaint;

(2) the date the complaint is received by the council;

(3) the subject matter of the complaint;

(4) the name of each person contacted in relation to the complaint;

(5) a summary of the results of the review or investigation of the complaint; and

(6) an explanation of the reason the file was closed, if the council closed the file without taking action other than to investigate the complaint.

(b) The council shall provide to the person filing the complaint and to each person who is a subject of the complaint a copy of the council's policies and procedures relating to complaint investigation and resolution.

(c) The council, at least quarterly and until final disposition of the complaint, shall notify the person filing the complaint and each person who is a subject of the complaint of the status of the investigation unless the notice would jeopardize an undercover investigation.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 112.021. PROTECTION AND ADVOCACY OF INDIVIDUAL RIGHTS. The protection and advocacy system shall have access to records as required by the provisions of the applicable federal disability laws.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 603, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 112.022. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. (a) The council shall hire an executive director in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Section 15025 and its subsequent amendments to carry out the policies and activities established by the council.

(b) The executive director shall hire and supervise necessary staff who will be responsible solely for carrying out activities designated by the council and consistent with:

(1) applicable federal developmental disability laws; and

(2) this chapter.

(c) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall provide to members of the council and to council employees, as often as necessary, information regarding the requirements for office or employment under this subchapter, including information regarding a person's responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state officers or employees.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.405, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 112.0221. EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY POLICY. (a) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall prepare and maintain a written policy statement that implements a program of equal employment opportunity to ensure that all personnel decisions are made without regard to race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin.

(b) The policy statement must include:

(1) personnel policies, including policies relating to recruitment, evaluation, selection, training, and promotion of personnel, that show the intent of the council to avoid the unlawful employment practices described by Chapter 21, Labor Code; and

(2) an analysis of the extent to which the composition of the council's personnel is in accordance with state and federal law and a description of reasonable methods to achieve compliance with state and federal law.

(c) The policy statement must:

(1) be updated annually;

(2) be reviewed by the Texas Workforce Commission civil rights division for compliance with Subsection (b)(1); and

(3) be filed with the governor's office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.406, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 112.023. SUNSET PROVISION. The Texas Council for Developmental Disabilities is subject to Chapter 325, Government Code (Texas Sunset Act). Unless continued in existence as provided by that chapter, the council is abolished and this chapter expires September 1, 2027.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 729, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 2.20(34), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Sec. 112.021 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, 5.01(a)(28), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 17, Sec. 4.10, eff. Nov. 12, 1991; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 79, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1227 (H.B. 1116), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 928 (H.B. 3249), Sec. 3.05, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 2 (S.B. 2), Sec. 2.11, eff. July 10, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (S.B. 652), Sec. 2.17, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 99 (H.B. 1679), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. PREVENTION OF DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

For expiration of Subsection (a), see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.041. PURPOSE AND POLICY. (a) The purpose of this Act is to minimize the economic and human losses in Texas caused by preventable disabilities through the establishment of a joint private-public initiative called the Office for the Prevention of Developmental Disabilities.

(b) The legislature finds there is a strong need for a unified, comprehensive prevention effort in the State of Texas. Many state agencies, as well as private organizations and local public agencies, are involved in prevention activities that can reduce the incidence and severity of developmental disabilities. However, a coordinated statewide plan that identifies and consolidates research findings and prevention activities has yet to be developed.

(c) The legislature further finds that by establishing a mechanism by which prevention activities can be better coordinated and needed prevention programs can be initiated, the State of Texas will be making an important investment in Texas's future.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 112.042. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Health and Human Services Commission.

(1-a) "Developmental disability" means a severe, chronic disability that:

(A) is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or to a combination of a mental and physical impairment;

(B) is manifested before a person reaches the age of 22;

(C) is likely to continue indefinitely;

(D) results in substantial functional limitations in three or more major life activities, including:

(i) self-care;

(ii) receptive and expressive language;

(iii) learning;

(iv) mobility;

(v) self-direction;

(vi) capacity for independent living; and

(vii) economic sufficiency; and

(E) reflects the person's needs for a combination and sequence of special interdisciplinary or generic care, treatment, or other lifelong or extended services that are individually planned and coordinated.

(1-b) "Executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission.

(2) "Executive committee" means the executive committee of the Office for the Prevention of Developmental Disabilities.

(3) "Office" means the Office for the Prevention of Developmental Disabilities.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 200), Sec. 1.21(b), eff. September 1, 2015.

For expiration of this section, see Subsection (c).

Sec. 112.0421. APPLICABILITY AND EXPIRATION OF CERTAIN PROVISIONS. (a) Sections 112.041(a), 112.043, 112.045, 112.0451, 112.0452, 112.0453, 112.0454, 112.046, 112.047, 112.0471, and 112.0472 apply only until the date the executive commissioner begins to administer this subchapter and the commission assumes the duties and functions of the Office for the Prevention of Developmental Disabilities in accordance with Section 112.0431.

(b) On the date the provisions listed in Subsection (a) cease to apply, the executive committee under Section 112.045 and the board of advisors under Section 112.046 are abolished.

(c) This section and Sections 112.041(a), 112.043, 112.045, 112.0451, 112.0452, 112.0453, 112.0454, 112.046, 112.047, 112.0471, and 112.0472 expire on the last day of the period prescribed by Section 531.02001(2), Government Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 200), Sec. 1.21(c), eff. September 1, 2015.

For expiration of this section, see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.043. OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES; ADMINISTRATIVE ATTACHMENT. (a) The Office for the Prevention of Developmental Disabilities is administratively attached to the Health and Human Services Commission.

(b) The Health and Human Services Commission shall:

(1) provide administrative assistance, services, and materials to the office;

(2) accept, deposit, and disburse money made available to the office;

(3) accept gifts and grants on behalf of the office from any public or private entity;

(4) pay the salaries and benefits of the executive director and staff of the office;

(5) reimburse the travel expenses and other actual and necessary expenses of the executive committee, executive director, and staff of the office incurred in the performance of a function of the office, as provided by the General Appropriations Act;

(6) apply for and receive on behalf of the office any appropriations, gifts, or other money from the state or federal government or any other public or private entity, subject to limitations and conditions prescribed by legislative appropriation;

(7) provide the office with adequate computer equipment and support; and

(8) provide the office with adequate office space and permit the executive committee to meet in facilities of the commission.

(c) The executive director and staff of the office are employees of the office and not employees of the Health and Human Services Commission.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.407, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 112.0431. ADMINISTRATION OF SUBCHAPTER; CERTAIN REFERENCES. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this subchapter, the executive commissioner shall administer this subchapter beginning on the date specified in the transition plan under Section 531.0204, Government Code, and the commission shall perform the duties and functions of the Office for the Prevention of Developmental Disabilities in the organizational form the executive commissioner determines appropriate.

(b) Following the assumption of the administration of this subchapter by the executive commissioner and the duties and functions by the commission in accordance with Subsection (a):

(1) a reference in this subchapter to the office, the Office for the Prevention of Developmental Disabilities, or the executive committee of that office means the commission, the division or other organizational unit within the commission designated by the executive commissioner, or the executive commissioner, as appropriate; and

(2) a reference in any other law to the Office for the Prevention of Developmental Disabilities has the meaning assigned by Subdivision (1).

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 200), Sec. 1.21(c), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 112.044. DUTIES. The office shall:

(1) educate the public and attempt to promote sound public policy regarding the prevention of developmental disabilities;

(2) identify, collect, and disseminate information and data concerning the causes, frequency of occurrence, and preventability of developmental disabilities;

(3) work with appropriate divisions within the commission, state agencies, and other entities to develop a coordinated long-range plan to effectively monitor and reduce the incidence or severity of developmental disabilities;

(4) promote and facilitate the identification, development, coordination, and delivery of needed prevention services;

(5) solicit, receive, and spend grants and donations from public, private, state, and federal sources;

(6) identify and encourage establishment of needed reporting systems to track the causes and frequencies of occurrence of developmental disabilities;

(7) develop, operate, and monitor programs created under Section 112.048 addressing the prevention of specific targeted developmental disabilities;

(8) monitor and assess the effectiveness of divisions within the commission and of state agencies in preventing developmental disabilities;

(9) recommend the role each division within the commission and each state agency should have with regard to prevention of developmental disabilities;

(10) facilitate coordination of state agency prevention services and activities within the commission and among appropriate state agencies; and

(11) encourage cooperative, comprehensive, and complementary planning among public, private, and volunteer individuals and organizations engaged in prevention activities, providing prevention services, or conducting related research.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 200), Sec. 1.21(d), eff. September 1, 2015.

For expiration of this section, see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.045. EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE. (a) The executive committee is the governing body of the office.

(b) The executive committee is composed of nine members who have expertise in the field of developmental disabilities, of which three are appointed by the governor, three are appointed by the lieutenant governor, and three are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Appointments to the executive committee shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointees.

(c) The members serve for staggered six-year terms, with the terms of three members expiring February 1 of each odd-numbered year. Executive committee members receive no compensation but are entitled to reimbursement of actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(d) The governor shall designate a member of the executive committee as the presiding officer of the executive committee to serve in that capacity at the will of the governor.

(e) The executive committee shall meet at least quarterly and shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of the meetings.

(f) Any actions taken by the executive committee must be approved by a majority vote of the members present.

(g) The executive committee shall establish policies and procedures to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 557, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

For expiration of this section, see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.0451. CONFLICT OF INTEREST. A person may not be a member of the executive committee or act as the general counsel to the executive committee or the office if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

For expiration of this section, see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.0452. REMOVAL OF EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE MEMBER. (a) It is a ground for removal from the executive committee that a member:

(1) does not have at the time of taking office the qualifications required by Section 112.045;

(2) does not maintain during service on the executive committee the qualifications required by Section 112.045;

(3) is ineligible for membership under Section 112.045 or 112.0451;

(4) cannot, because of illness or disability, discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the member's term; or

(5) is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled executive committee meetings that the member is eligible to attend during a calendar year without an excuse approved by a majority vote of the executive committee.

(b) The validity of an action of the executive committee is not affected by the fact that it is taken when a ground for removal of an executive committee member exists.

(c) If the executive director has knowledge that a potential ground for removal exists, the executive director shall notify the presiding officer of the executive committee of the potential ground. The presiding officer shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists. If the potential ground for removal involves the presiding officer, the executive director shall notify the next highest ranking officer of the executive committee, who shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

For expiration of this section, see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.0453. EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE MEMBER TRAINING. (a) A person who is appointed to and qualifies for office as a member of the executive committee may not vote, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the executive committee until the person completes a training program that complies with this section.

(b) The training program must provide the person with information regarding:

(1) the legislation that created the office and the executive committee;

(2) the programs operated by the office;

(3) the role and functions of the office;

(4) the rules of the office with an emphasis on the rules that relate to disciplinary and investigatory authority;

(5) the current budget for the office;

(6) the results of the most recent formal audit of the office;

(7) the requirements of:

(A) the open meetings law, Chapter 551, Government Code;

(B) the public information law, Chapter 552, Government Code;

(C) the administrative procedure law, Chapter 2001, Government Code; and

(D) other laws relating to public officials, including conflict-of-interest laws; and

(8) any applicable ethics policies adopted by the office or the Texas Ethics Commission.

(c) A person appointed to the executive committee is entitled to reimbursement, as provided by the General Appropriations Act, for the travel expenses incurred in attending the training program regardless of whether the attendance at the program occurs before or after the person qualifies for office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

For expiration of this section, see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.0454. PUBLIC ACCESS. The executive committee shall develop and implement policies that provide the public with a reasonable opportunity to appear before the executive committee and to speak on any issue under the jurisdiction of the office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

For expiration of this section, see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.046. BOARD OF ADVISORS. (a) The executive committee may appoint a board of advisors composed of the following persons:

(1) representatives of government agencies that are responsible for prevention services for specified targeted disabilities and that contract with the office to provide those services;

(2) representatives of consumer groups, foundations, or corporations that contract for or donate to the office for prevention services for specific targeted disabilities;

(3) private citizens who volunteer services or donate to the office for prevention services for specific targeted disabilities; and

(4) other persons whose assistance the executive committee considers necessary to implement the purposes of this subchapter.

(b) The board of advisors may serve on task forces, solicit donations and grants, and perform any other duties assigned by the executive committee.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

For expiration of this section, see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.047. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. (a) The executive committee may hire an executive director to serve as the chief executive officer of the office and to perform the administrative duties of the office.

(b) The executive director serves at the will of the executive committee.

(c) The executive director may hire staff within guidelines established by the executive committee.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

For expiration of this section, see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.0471. QUALIFICATIONS AND STANDARDS OF CONDUCT. The executive director or the executive director's designee shall provide to members of the executive committee and to employees of the office, as often as necessary, information regarding the requirements for office or employment under this subchapter, including information regarding a person's responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state officers or employees.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

For expiration of this section, see Section 112.0421(c), Human Resources Code.

Sec. 112.0472. EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY POLICIES. (a) The executive director shall prepare and maintain a written policy statement that implements a program of equal employment opportunity to ensure that all personnel decisions are made without regard to race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin.

(b) The policy statement must include:

(1) personnel policies, including policies relating to recruitment, evaluation, selection, training, and promotion of personnel, that show the intent of the office to avoid the unlawful employment practices described by Chapter 21, Labor Code; and

(2) an analysis of the extent to which the composition of the office's personnel is in accordance with state and federal law and a description of reasonable methods to achieve compliance with state and federal law.

(c) The policy statement must:

(1) be updated annually;

(2) be reviewed by the Texas Workforce Commission civil rights division for compliance with Subsection (b)(1); and

(3) be filed with the governor's office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.408, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 112.048. PREVENTION PROGRAMS FOR TARGETED DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES. (a) The executive committee shall establish guidelines for:

(1) selecting targeted disabilities;

(2) assessing prevention services needs; and

(3) reviewing plans, budgets, and operations for programs under this section.

(b) The executive committee shall plan and implement prevention programs for specifically targeted developmental disabilities.

(c) A program under this section:

(1) must include a plan designed to reduce the incidence of a specifically targeted disability;

(2) must include a budget for implementing a plan;

(3) must be funded through:

(A) contracts for services from participating agencies;

(B) grants and gifts from private persons and consumer and advocacy organizations; and

(C) foundation support; and

(4) must be approved by the executive committee.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 200), Sec. 1.21(e), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 112.049. EVALUATION. (a) The office shall identify or encourage the establishment of needed statistical bases for each targeted group against which the office can measure how effectively a program under Section 112.048 is reducing the frequency or severity of a targeted developmental disability.

(b) The executive committee shall regularly monitor and evaluate the results of programs under Section 112.048.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 200), Sec. 1.21(e), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 112.050. GRANTS AND OTHER FUNDING. (a) The executive committee may apply for and distribute private, state, and federal funds to implement prevention policies set by the executive committee.

(b) The executive committee shall establish criteria for application and review of funding requests and accountability standards for recipients. The executive committee may adjust its criteria as necessary to meet requirements for federal funding.

(c) The executive committee may not submit a legislative appropriation request for general revenue funds for purposes of this subchapter.

(d) In addition to funding under Subsection (a), the office may accept and solicit gifts, donations, and grants of money from public and private sources, including the federal government, local governments, and private entities, to assist in financing the duties and functions of the office. The commission shall support office fund-raising efforts authorized by this subsection. Funds raised under this subsection may only be spent in furtherance of a duty or function of the office or in accordance with rules applicable to the office.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 200), Sec. 1.21(f), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 200), Sec. 1.21(g), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 112.051. REPORTS TO LEGISLATURE. The office shall submit by February 1 of each odd-numbered year biennial reports to the legislature detailing findings of the office and the results of programs under Section 112.048 and recommending improvements in the delivery of developmental disability prevention services.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (S.B. 200), Sec. 1.21(h), eff. September 1, 2015.